Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1446SV (1) 91 sc/js S.F. 276 Section 1. Section 35A.5, subsection 14, paragraph c, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 c. The number of hours of veteransâ services provided by 3 each county commission of veteran affairs executive director or 4 administrator during the previous calendar fiscal year. 5 Sec. 2. Section 35B.6, subsection 1, paragraph c, 6 subparagraphs (1) and (2), Code 2025, are amended by striking 7 the subparagraphs and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 8 (1) (a) Upon the employment of an executive director or 9 administrator, the executive director or administrator shall 10 comply with all directives of the commandant of the Iowa 11 department of veterans affairs regarding the completion of any 12 training or certification required for the personâs position 13 under applicable state and federal law. The executive director 14 or administrator shall also obtain a personal identification 15 verification card necessary to access the veterans benefits 16 management system. An executive director or administrator 17 shall be removed from office if, after one year of employment, 18 the executive director or administrator has not done all of the 19 following: 20 (i) Obtained certification. 21 (ii) Obtained a personal identification verification card. 22 (iii) Completed training directed by the commandant of the 23 Iowa department of veterans affairs. 24 (b) Upon a request from a county commission of veteran 25 affairs and based on extenuating circumstances, the commandant 26 of the Iowa department of veterans affairs may extend the time 27 frame for an executive director or administrator to obtain a 28 personal identification verification card. 29 (2) To complete continuing education federally required for 30 the personâs position, an executive director or administrator 31 shall receive training only from entities approved by the 32 commandant of the Iowa department of veterans affairs. 33 Failure of an executive director or administrator to maintain 34 certification shall be cause for removal from office. The 35 -1- LSB 1446SV (1) 91 sc/js 1/ 2 S.F. 276 expenses of training the executive director or administrator 1 shall be paid from the appropriation authorized in section 2 35B.14. 3